Vermont, session 2025-2026, S15.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2903 is amended to read:
§ 2903. PREVENTING EARLY SCHOOL FAILURE; READING
INSTRUCTION
(a) Statement of policy. The ability to read is critical to success in learning.
Children who fail to read by the end of the first grade will likely fall further
behind in school. The personal and economic costs of reading failure are
enormous both while the student remains in school and long afterward. All
students need to receive systematic and explicit evidence-based reading
VT LEG #379782 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.15
2025 Page 2 of 3
instruction in the early grades from a teacher who is skilled in teaching the
foundational components of reading, including phonemic awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension. Students who require intensive
supplemental instruction tailored to the unique difficulties encountered shall be
provided those additional supports by an appropriately trained education
professional.
(b) Foundation for literacy.
(1) The Agency of Education, in collaboration with the State Board of
Education, the Agency of Human Services, higher education, literacy
organizations, and others, shall develop a plan for establishing a
comprehensive system of services for early education in public schools that
offer instruction in grades kindergarten through grade three to ensure that all
students learn to read by the end of the third grade. The plan shall be updated
at least once every five years following its initial submission in 1998.
(2) Approved independent schools that are eligible to receive public
tuition shall develop a grade-level appropriate school literacy plan that is
informed by student needs and assessment data. The plan may include
identification of a literacy vision, goals, and priorities and shall address the
following topics:
(A) measures and indicators;
VT LEG #379782 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.15
2025 Page 3 of 3
(B) screening, assessment, instruction and intervention, and progress
monitoring, consistent with section 2907 of this title; and
(C) professional learning activities consistent with section 1710 of
this title.
(c) Reading instruction. A public school or approved independent school
that is eligible to receive public tuition that offers instruction in grades
kindergarten, one, two, or three shall provide systematic and explicit evidence-
based reading instruction to all students. In addition, such all public schools
and approved independent schools that are eligible to receive public tuition
shall provide supplemental reading instruction to any enrolled student whose
reading proficiency falls below proficiency standards for the student’s grade
level or whose reading proficiency prevents progress in school. Schools shall
provide support and information to the parents and legal guardians of such
students regarding the student’s current level of reading proficiency, which
shall be based on valid and reliable assessments.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379782 v.1